Wyoming, session 2025, SF0158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 26-22-506 is created to read:
26-22-506. Third party access to network contracts;
dental care service plans; waiver prohibited; definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Contracting entity" means any person that
enters into a contract with a dental care provider for the
delivery of dental care services;
(ii) "Covered person" means a policyholder,
subscriber, enrollee or other person participating in a
dental care service plan that provides for dental care
services;
(iii) "Dental care provider" means any person
licensed to practice dentistry in Wyoming and who provides
dental care services pursuant to a dental care service
plan;
(iv) "Dental care service plan" means a policy,
contract, plan, certificate or agreement that provides for
third party payment or prepayment of dental care services
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and that is delivered or issued for delivery by or through
a dental carrier on a standalone basis;
(v) "Dental care services" means diagnostic,
preventative, maintenance and therapeutic dental care.
"Dental care services" shall not include services that are
billed as medical expenses under a health benefit plan;
(vi) "Dental carrier" means a person subject to
the insurance laws and regulations of this state, or
subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, including
an insurance company offering dental care service plans or
any other person that provides a dental care service plan;
(vii) "Dentist agent" means a person that
contracts with a dental care provider to establish an
agency relationship for purposes of processing bills for
services provided by the dental care provider under the
terms and conditions of a contract between the dentist
agent and a dental care provider. A contract between a
dentist agent and a dental care provider may permit the
dentist agent to submit bills, request reconsideration and
receive reimbursement;
(viii) "Network contract" means a contract
between a contracting entity and a dental care provider
that specifies the rights and responsibilities of the
contracting entity and provides for the delivery and
payment of dental care services to a covered person;
(ix) "Third party" means a person, not including
a covered person, who enters into a contract with a
contracting entity to access the dental care services or
contractual discounts of a network contract. "Third party"
shall not include an employer or other group for whom the
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
dental carrier or contracting entity provides
administrative services;
(x) "Virtual credit card payment" means an
electronic funds transfer where a dental care service plan,
or a contracted vendor, issues a single-use series of
numbers associated with the payment of dental care services
performed by a dental care provider and chargeable up to a
predetermined dollar amount, where the dental care provider
is responsible for processing the payment by a credit card
terminal or internal port. "Virtual credit card payment"
includes only electronic or virtual credit card payments
where no physical card is used and the single use
electronic credit card expires upon payment processing.
(b) A contracting entity may grant a third party
access to a network contract, or to a dental care
provider's dental care service prices or contractual
discounts provided pursuant to a network contract, if all
of the following requirements are met:
(i) At the time the network contract is entered
into, renewed or material modifications relevant to
granting access to a third party are made, the dental
carrier allows any dental care provider that is part of the
dental carrier's provider network to choose to not
participate in third-party access to the dental care
provider's service prices and discounted rates;
(ii) The contracting entity allows the dental
care provider to enter into a contract directly with the
third party;
(iii) The network contract specifically states
that the contracting entity may enter into an agreement
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
with a third party to allow the third party to obtain the
contracting entity's rights and responsibilities under the
network contract as if the third party were the contracting
entity. If the contracting entity is a dental carrier, the
network contract shall specifically state that the dental
care provider may choose not to participate in third-party
access to the network contract and that the dental care
provider chose to participate in third-party access at the
time the network contract was entered into or renewed;
(iv) The third party accessing the network
contract agrees to comply with all of the network
contract's terms and conditions;
(v) The contracting entity identifies to the
dental care provider, in writing, all third parties
participating in the network contract as of the date the
network contract is entered into or renewed;
(vi) The contracting entity provides a list of
all third parties participating in the network contract on
the contracting entity's website. The contracting entity
shall update and provide an updated list of third parties
on its website not less than every ninety (90) days;
(vii) The contracting entity notifies a dental
care provider under the network contract at least thirty
(30) days prior to a new third party leasing or purchasing
the network contract;
(viii) The contracting entity requires a third
party to identify, for all remittance advice or
explanations of payments under which a discount applies,
the source of the discount. This paragraph shall not apply
to an electronic transaction mandated by the federal Health
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L.
104-191;
(ix) A third party's right to a dental care
provider's discounted rate is terminated as of the
termination date of the network contract;
(x) In the adjudication of any claim under the
network contract, the contracting entity makes available to
the dental care provider a copy of the network contract not
later than thirty (30) days after a request for the network
contract is received.
(c) A contracting entity shall not cancel or
terminate a contractual relationship with, or refuse to
contract with, a dental care provider on the grounds that
the dental care provider refuses to allow access by a third
party to the dental care services and discounted rates of
the dental care provider.
(d) This section shall not apply if access to a
provider network contract is granted to a dental carrier or
an entity operating in accordance with the same brand
licensee program as the contracting entity or to an entity
that is an affiliate of the contracting entity. A list of
the contracting entity's affiliates shall be made available
to a provider on the contracting entity's website.
(e) No dental care provider shall be bound by, or
required to perform, dental care services under a network
contract for which access has been granted to a third party
in violation of this section.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(f) A dental care service plan shall not require
payments to be made to dental care providers solely by
virtual credit card payments.
(g) A dental care service plan, when initiating
payments to a dental care provider through a virtual credit
card payment or when changing to virtual credit card
payments if the dental care provider consents, shall do all
of the following:
(i) Notify the dental care provider of any fees
associated with each payment method available from the
dental care service plan;
(ii) Inform the dental care provider of the
available options for methods of payment and provide clear
instructions to the dental care provider for the selection
of an alternative payment method that does not impose fees.
(h) If a dental care provider opts out of a method of
payment that is offered by a dental care service plan, that
decision remains in effect unless the dental care provider
opts back into the prior method of payment or a new
contract is executed.
(j) A dental care service plan that transmits
payments to a dental care provider in accordance with the
standards of 45 C.F.R. §§ 162.1601 and 162.1602 shall not
charge a fee solely for the transmission of the payment to
the dental care provider unless the dental care provider
has consented to payment of the fee. When transmitting a
national automated clearinghouse payment, a dentist agent
may charge a reasonable fee related to bank transmittal,
transaction management, data management, portal services
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and other value added services associated with the
transmission of the payment.
(k) The requirements of this section shall not be
waived unless knowingly and voluntarily waived by the party
bound by the contract.
Section 2. This act applies to contracts entered into
on or after July 1, 2025 and nothing in this act is
construed to impair any existing contracts entered into
before July 1, 2025.
Section 3. The department of insurance shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0158
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8